Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2213XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 88 Section 1. Section 299.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. a. The board of directors of 3 each public school district and the governing body of each 4 accredited nonpublic school shall adopt a policy that requires 5 the school district or accredited nonpublic school to grant 6 a student who is enrolled in grades nine through twelve at 7 least one excused absence each school year when the student is 8 absent from school because of the studentâs participation in a 9 civic or political event. The policy shall require all of the 10 following: 11 (1) The board of directors of the school district or the 12 governing body of the accredited nonpublic school shall not 13 grant the student an excused absence to participate in the 14 civic or political event unless the student gives notice of 15 the studentâs intent to participate in the civic or political 16 event to an administrator employed by the board of directors 17 of the school district or the governing body of the accredited 18 nonpublic school in advance of the civic or political event. 19 (2) The student shall demonstrate the studentâs knowledge 20 of the civic or political event in which the student 21 participated by preparing a short essay, presenting information 22 related to the civic or political event, or through any 23 other means the school determines will demonstrate a proper 24 representation of what the student learned during the civic or 25 political event. 26 b. For purposes of this subsection, âcivic or political 27 eventâ includes all of the following: 28 (1) Voting in an election. 29 (2) Serving as a poll worker. 30 (3) Participating in a strike. 31 (4) Participating in a public comment period before any 32 public body. 33 (5) Attending a speech by a candidate for a public office. 34 (6) Attending a political forum. 35 -1- LSB 2213XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 88 (7) Attending a civic forum. 1 (8) Attending a town hall meeting. 2 Sec. 2. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2025, 3 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 4 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) While participating in a civic 5 or political event in accordance with a policy adopted under 6 subsection 3A. 7 Sec. 3. Section 299.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 8 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. âChronically absentâ means any absence from school for 10 more than ten percent of the days or hours in the grading 11 period established by a public school ; provided, however, that 12 an absence from school that is related to participation in a 13 civic or political event in accordance with a policy adopted 14 under section 299.1, subsection 3A, shall not count toward this 15 amount . 16